Hawaii statutes.
[§514B-87] Rescission after sales contract
becomes binding. (a) Purchasers shall have a thirty-day right to rescind
a binding sales contract for the purchase of a unit from a developer if there
is a material change in the project. This rescission right shall not apply,
however, in the event of any additions, deletions, modifications and
reservations including, without limitation, the merger or addition or phasing
of a project, made pursuant to the terms of the declaration.

(b) Upon delivery to a purchaser of a
description of the material change on a form prescribed by the commission, the
purchaser may waive the purchaser's rescission right provided in subsection (a)
by:

(1) Checking the waiver box on the option to rescind
sales contract instrument, signing it, and delivering it to the seller;

(2) Letting the thirty-day rescission period expire
without taking any action to rescind; or

(3) Closing the purchase of the unit before the
thirty-day rescission period expires.

(c) In order to be valid, a rescission form
must be signed by all purchasers of the affected unit, and postmarked no later
than midnight of the thirtieth calendar day after the date that the purchasers
received the rescission form from the seller. In the event of a valid exercise
of a purchaser's right of rescission pursuant to this section, the purchasers
shall be entitled to a prompt and full refund of any moneys paid.

(d) The rescission form obtained by the seller
under this section shall be kept on file in possession of the seller and shall
be subject to inspection at a reasonable time by the commission or its staff or
agents, for a period of three years from the date the receipt or return receipt
was obtained.

(e) This section shall not preclude a
purchaser from exercising any rescission rights pursuant to a contract for the
sale of a unit or any applicable common law remedies. [L 2005, c 93, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next